Massachusetts, session 194th, S145.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 21 of chapter 119 of the general laws, as so appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended, in line 1, by striking out the word “51H” and inserting in
place thereof the following word:- 51I
SECTION 2. Chapter 119 of the general laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 51I. There is a rebuttal presumption that neglect does not include a failure of a
victim of domestic violence to:
(a) Prevent a child from witnessing the domestic violence;
(b) Leave the home in which the alleged perpetrator resides;
(c) End a relationship with the alleged perpetrator;
of 2

(d) Report the domestic violence to law enforcement or the department of children
and families;
(e) Seek an abuse prevention order under Chapter 209A; and
(f) Seek a harassment prevention order under Chapter 258E.
of 2